Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202577-2916
Community betterment organization; program proposal; apply for tax credit status.

Any community betterment organization which provides community assistance or community services in a community development area may apply any time during the fiscal year to the department to have one or more programs certified for tax credit status as provided in sections 77-2917 to 77-2920. The proposal shall set forth the program to be conducted, the community development area, the estimated amount to be required for completion of the program or the annual estimated amount required for an ongoing program, the plans for implementing the program, and the amount of contributions committed or anticipated for such activities or services.

Laws 2025, LB650, § 4.